Louisiana, session 2026, HB847.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:1206(A) and 1207(C) and (G) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 3:1206(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1206. Election of three supervisors for each district
A. Within thirty days after the date of issuance by the secretary of state of
a certificate of organization of a soil and water conservation district, nomination
petitions may be filed with the state soil and water conservation commission to
nominate candidates for supervisors of the district. The commission shall have
authority to extend the time within which nominating petitions may be filed. No
nominating petition shall be accepted by the board, unless it shall be the registrar of
voters in the parish where the signers reside has certified, pursuant to R.S. 18:3, that
the petition has been subscribed by twenty-five or more qualified voters within the
district. who are qualified to vote under the constitution and law of this state.
Qualified voters may sign more than one such nominating petition to nominate more
than one candidate for supervisor. The commission shall give due notice of an
election to be held for the election of three supervisors for the district. The names
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 847 ENROLLED
of all nominees on behalf of whom nominating petitions have been filed within the
time herein designated in this Subsection shall be printed, arranged in the
alphabetical order of the surnames, upon ballots, with a square before each name and
a direction to insert an X mark in the square before any three names to indicate the
voter's preference. All qualified voters within the district who are qualified to vote
under the constitution and laws of this state shall be eligible to vote in the election.
Only qualified voters shall be eligible to vote. submitted to the secretary of state as
candidates in an election to be held by the secretary of state as a private election.
The three candidates who shall receive the largest number, respectively, of the votes
cast in such the election shall be the elected supervisors for such the district. The
state commission shall pay all the expenses of such election, shall supervise the
conduct thereof, shall prescribe regulations governing the conduct of such election,
and shall publish the results thereof.
* * *
C. The secretary of state and the commissioner of agriculture and forestry
may adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the intent and
purposes of this Section.
§1207. Appointment, qualifications, tenure of supervisors
* * *
C. The three elected supervisors of the district shall be elected annually, one
each year., These elections of supervisors shall be held throughout the state
regularly on the second Saturday in June, each year, in accordance with the general
procedure and in the manner prescribed in R.S. 3:1206. Terms of office of all
supervisors so elected shall begin on July 1st first, following the date of their
election. All supervisors presently in office and serving on the governing body of
a conservation district, shall remain in office until their terms expire, but from and
after August 1st, 1956, all vacancies shall be filled in the manner above prescribed,
and whenever the term of any supervisor expires, it shall be filled by an election to
be held on the second Saturday in June after the expiration of said term.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 847 ENROLLED
G. Any supervisor may be removed by the commission upon notice and
hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason. A
supervisor shall not qualify for reappointment or reelection unless he shall have
attended at least sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the scheduled district meetings,
within a twelve month period, provided, however, upon a showing of good cause,
this condition may be waived by resolution duly adopted by the state soil and water
conservation commission.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.